California, session 20252026, AB2287.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7110 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7110. (a) Willful or deliberate disregard and violation of the building laws of the state, or of any political subdivision thereof, or of any of the following references to or provisions of law, constitutes a cause for disciplinary action against a licensee:(a)(1) Section 8550 or 8556.(b)(2) Sections 1689.5 to 1689.15, inclusive, of the Civil Code.(c)(3) The safety laws or labor laws or compensation insurance laws or Unemployment Insurance Code of the state.(d)(4) The Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).(e)(5) Any provision of the Health and Safety Code or Water Code, relating to the digging, boring, or drilling of water wells.(f)(6) Any provision of Article 2 (commencing with Section 4216) of Chapter 3.1 of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.(g)(7) Section 374.3 of the Penal Code or any substantially similar law or ordinance that is promulgated by a local government agency as defined in Section 82041 of the Government Code.(h)(8) Any state or local law relating to the issuance of building permits.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a licensee who engages in the use of technologies, tools, and equipment in the course of performing construction work pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to a cause for disciplinary action against themselves.